Arkansas, session 2025, SB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-21-112(e), concerning technology liaisons
to the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, is
amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall assign one (1) individual to serve as a
technology liaison to the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation.
(2) The secretary shall assign one (1) individual from the staff
of the Building Authority Division to serve as a physical plant liaison to
the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-63-602 is amended to read as follows:
*MBM119*
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
6-63-602. Administration.
(a)(1) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall have administrative responsibility for developing,
implementing, and maintaining a catastrophic leave bank program for
nonfaculty benefits-eligible, full-time employees of the state institutions
of higher education.
(2) Each state institution of higher education may participate
in the catastrophic leave bank authorized by this section and administered by
the Office of Personnel Management, or the institution may establish a
catastrophic leave bank for its employees.
(b) Accrued annual leave and sick leave of employees may be donated to
a catastrophic leave bank.
(c) Catastrophic leave with pay may be granted to an employee when
such employee is unable to perform his or her duties due to a catastrophic
illness.
(d) An employee may be eligible for catastrophic leave when:
(1) The employee has been employed by the state institution of
higher education for more than two (2) years;
(2) An acceptable medical certificate from a physician
supporting the continued absence is on file; and
(3) The employee has not been disciplined for any leave abuse
during the past two (2) years.
(e) If the illness or injury is that of an employee and is covered by
workers' compensation, the compensation based on catastrophic leave when
combined with the weekly workers' compensation benefit received by the
employee shall not exceed the compensation being received by the employee at
the onset of the illness or injury.
(f) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services or his or her designee shall promulgate necessary
rules as deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(g) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to repeal in any way
the exclusion of nonclassified employees of state-supported institutions of
higher education under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, § 21-4-
201 et seq.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-21-205 is amended to read as follows:
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
15-21-205. State Surveyor.
(a) The Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board shall employ, in
consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services, a State Surveyor to be the head of the
Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems
Office.
(b) The State Surveyor shall:
(1) Be a person of proven administrative ability, a registered
professional surveyor, and a resident of the State of Arkansas with training
and experience properly qualifying the person for the performance of his or
her official duties;
(2) Be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary
of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services after
consultation with the State Board of Licensure for Professional Engineers and
Professional Surveyors and the Arkansas Society of Professional Surveyors;
(3) Devote his or her full time to the performance of his or her
official functions and duties as prescribed in this subchapter;
(4) Hold no other lucrative position while serving as State
Surveyor; and
(5) Receive such compensation as may be prescribed by law.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §15-21-206(1), concerning the state surveyor,
is amended to read as follows:
The State Surveyor, acting under the supervision and direction of the
Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office and the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, shall have
the following authority and responsibility:
(1) To:
(A) Restore, maintain, and preserve the land survey
monuments, section corners, and quarter section corners established by the
United States Public Land Survey within the State of Arkansas, together with
all pertinent field notes, plats, and documents; and
(B) Restore, establish, maintain, and preserve other
boundary markers as may be determined to be necessary or important in
establishing and maintaining accurate land descriptions in this state;

02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-21-207 is amended to read as follows:
15-21-207. Surveyors generally.
(a) Every employee of the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas
Geographic Information Systems Office or the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services, who performs any work required by law to be
done by a registered professional surveyor shall be a registered surveyor.
(b) Neither the State Surveyor nor any employee of the department
performing work on behalf of the division shall engage in private land
surveying or consultation while so employed by the department.
(c) The State Surveyor and employees of the department performing work
on behalf of the division shall cooperate with and assist county surveyors in
performing their duties as prescribed by law and shall cooperate with and
assist other surveyors in locating or establishing section corner markers and
other land description markers and monuments.
(d) In performing the duties and responsibilities provided for in this
subchapter, the State Surveyor and employees of the Division of Land Surveys
of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office and the department may
solicit the advice and assistance of the county surveyor in each county and
other surveyors in the county.
(e) If there are no registered professional surveyors in a particular
county, the department on behalf of the division may employ qualified
registered professional surveyors from other areas of the state to assist the
division in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this
subchapter.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 15-21-208 is amended to read as follows:
15-21-208. Right to enter private property.
(a) The State Surveyor or any employee of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services or of the Division of Land
Surveys of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office shall have the
right to enter upon private property for the purpose of making surveys or
searching for, locating, relocating, or remonumenting land monuments,
levelling stations, or section corners.
(b) Employees of the department or division shall be immune from
arrest for trespass in performing their duties as prescribed in this
subchapter and under the direction of a registered professional land surveyor
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
but shall always, when practical, announce and identify themselves and their
intentions before entering upon private property.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-21-503(c), concerning the Arkansas
Geographic Information Systems Board, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) A chair and a vice chair shall be elected by the board
membership to oversee all board and committee meetings.
(B) Members of the board must elect a chair and vice chair
every year.
(2)(A) The board shall appoint the State Geographic Information
Officer to serve with the approval and at the pleasure of the Governor.
(B) The State Geographic Information Officer will:
(i) Assist the board in developing a comprehensive
plan and evaluation procedures on how the state should implement tactical and
strategic geographic information systems and land information systems
planning;
(ii) Implement informational and educational
programs; and
(iii) Coordinate intrastate geographic information
systems and land information systems efforts.
(C) The State Geographic Information Officer shall report
to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 16-93-214(b), concerning the Safe Arkansas
App, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) To the extent permitted by federal law, the Parole Post-Prison
Transfer Board shall administer a mobile application that shall provide the
information set out in subsection (c) of this section concerning:
(A) An inmate who is being considered for parole; or
(B) A parolee who is on parole.
(2) The mobile application required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be known as the “Safe Arkansas App”.
(3) To facilitate the administration of the mobile application
required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the board may seek the
assistance of the Division of Information Systems of the Department of
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services or enter into a contract
for technical database and data processing services.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1405(e), concerning bidding
procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) When it is obvious from examination of the bid document that
it was the intent of a bidder to submit a responsive bid and because of a
scrivener's error, the bid, if accepted, would create a serious financial
loss to the bidder, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services may relieve the bidder from responsibility
under his or her bond and may reject the bid.
(B) However, for projects undertaken by public
institutions of higher education exempt from review and approval of the
division, the chief executive officer of the public institution of higher
education or his or her designee may relieve the bidder from responsibility
under his or her bond and may reject his or her bid in the same manner and
within the same period as allowed by the division.
(2) As used in this section, “scrivener's error” means:
(A) An error in the calculation of a bid which can be
documented by clear and convincing written evidence and which can be clearly
shown by objective evidence drawn from inspection of the original work
papers, documents, or materials used in the preparation of the bid sought to
be withdrawn; and
(B) In the case of a bid sought to be withdrawn, the bid
was submitted in good faith and the mistake was due to a calculation or
clerical error, an inadvertent omission, or a typographical error as opposed
to an error in judgment.
(3)(A) To receive relief under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section, the bidder must serve written notice to the secretary or to the
chief executive officer or his or her designee of a public institution of
higher education exempt from review and approval of the division any time
after the bid opening, but no later than seventy-two (72) hours after
receiving the intent to award, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
(B) Failure to make a withdrawal request within seventy-
two (72) hours shall constitute a waiver by the bidder of the bidder's right
to claim that the mistake in his or her bid was a scrivener's error.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(4) In the event the secretary or the chief executive officer or
his or her designee of a public institution of higher education exempt from
review and approval of the division has relieved the bidder from
responsibility under his or her bond, action on the remaining bids should be
considered as though the withdrawn bid had not been received.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1413(a)(2), concerning projects
constructed with private funds, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Before the public institution of higher education shall
enter into a contract with an architect, engineer, construction manager, or
contractor for the design, construction, or financing of any project financed
from private funds as provided in this section, it shall submit to the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State and the Legislative Council, in writing, a
summary statement setting forth a general description of the proposed
project, its estimated overall cost, and the method proposed to finance the
cost, including a description of the sources and amount of private funds.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may forward a
copy of this statement to the Building Authority Division, the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, and the
Governor for information; and

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1602(c), concerning payroll
deductions, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Deductions authorized by this section shall be made in compliance
with rules and procedures established by the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1603(a), concerning procedures for
position control, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall establish procedures for exercising position
control applicable to those state agencies subject to the provisions of the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1604(a), concerning salary from two
agencies, is amended to read as follows:
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no
person drawing a salary or other compensation from one state agency shall be
paid salary or compensation, other than actual expenses, from any other state
agency except upon written certification to and approval by the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services and by
the head of each state agency, stating that:
(1) The work performed for the other state agency does not
interfere with the proper and required performance of the person's duties;
and
(2) The combined salary payments from the state agencies do not
exceed the larger maximum annual salary of the line-item position authorized
for either state agency from which the employee is being paid.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1606(a), concerning the review of
payroll, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall review the payroll of state agencies covered by the provisions
of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., with
respect to the salaries of all employees of affected state agencies. This
review shall determine the correctness of each payroll with respect to each
position to assure compliance with the compensation plan and to assure that
no position is being paid, during any payroll period, an amount greater than
authorized in the compensation plan or the amount authorized for the position
in the appropriation act applicable to the agency.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1607(a), concerning the salaries of
employees, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except for those state agencies which operate principally on a
scholastic year, or on a part-time basis, or where such salaries or personal
services are specifically established for a period less than one (1) year,
all salaries established by the General Assembly shall be considered to be a
maximum amount to be paid for a twelve-month payroll period. No greater
amount than that established for the maximum annual salary of any state
official or employee shall be paid to such employee during any such twelve-
month payroll period, nor shall more than one-twelfth (1/12) of such annual
salary be paid to any such employee during any calendar month unless
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
authorized in this subchapter.
(2) The limitations set out in this section may be converted to
biweekly or weekly increments of one-twenty-sixth (1/26) or one-fifty-second
(1/52) of the maximum annual salary.
(3) For complying with federal requirements, upon approval of
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services in consultation with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the
maximum annual salaries may be converted to hourly rates of pay for positions
established on the basis of twelve (12) months or less if authorized by law.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1610(c), concerning retroactive pay,
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Salary payments made to correct an administrative error shall
not be considered retroactive pay, nor shall such payment be construed as
exceeding the employee's maximum authorized pay.
(2) Payments under subdivision (c)(1) of this section may be
made for a preceding fiscal year if:
(A) Requested within twelve (12) months of the end of the
preceding fiscal year; and
(B) Upon the consent of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services in consultation with the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1612(b), concerning overtime pay, is
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) All state departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and
institutions may pay overtime to their employees, under the rules and
regulations set out by the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.
(2)(A) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services will specify those specific employees or
groups of employees other than employees of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation eligible to receive overtime compensation, the circumstances
under which overtime pay is to be allowed, and other matters the secretary
finds appropriate and necessary to comply with the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938 as regards the payment of overtime compensation.
(B) The Director of State Highways and Transportation
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
shall make these determinations as to employees of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 19-11-215 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-215. Office of State Procurement.
(a) There is created within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services the Office of State Procurement to be
administered by the State Procurement Director.
(b)(1) The Office of State Procurement shall be subject to the
supervision and management of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
(2) The rules authorized in this subchapter shall be approved by
the secretary prior to the filing of the rules in accordance with the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 19-11-216 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-216. State Procurement Director.
(a)(1) The executive head of the Office of State Procurement is
designated as the administrator of the Office of State Procurement, and as
such, he or she shall be known and designated as the “State Procurement
Director”.
(2) The State Procurement Director shall be appointed by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.
(b) The State Procurement Director shall be at least thirty (30) years
of age, of good moral character, and of demonstrated ability or capacity in
the field of purchasing commodities and services.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 19-11-217(b), concerning the State
Procurement Director, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter and upon the
approval of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services, the State Procurement Director shall have the
authority and responsibility to promulgate rules consistent with this
subchapter.
(2) In addition, consistent with the provisions of this
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
subchapter, the director may adopt rules governing the internal procedures of
the Office of State Procurement.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 19-11-218(a)(1), concerning written
delegation orders, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Subject to the provisions of the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., and the approval of the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, the
State Procurement Director may:
(1) Employ and supervise such assistants and other persons as
may be necessary;

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 19-11-220(b), concerning agency
procurement officials, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Each official shall manage and establish internal procedures
for the procurement office of the state agency authorized to have the
official to ensure adequate administrative procedures and controls pursuant
to law and the procurement rules.
(2)(A) Approval by the Office of State Procurement of contracts
administered by the official shall not be required, unless a determination
has been made by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services that administrative procedures and controls are not
adequate.
(B)(i) Such a determination shall result in notification
by the secretary of the specific deficiencies and the reasons therefor.
(ii) After the notification, approval of contracts by
the Office of State Procurement shall be required until the secretary
determines that the deficiencies have been corrected.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 19-11-226 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-226. Recommendations.
(a) The State Procurement Director shall maintain a close and
cooperative relationship with the using agencies.
(b)(1) The director shall afford each using agency reasonable
opportunity to participate in and make recommendations with respect to
matters affecting the using agency.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(2) At any time, any using agency may make recommendations to
the director, and the director may make recommendations to any using agency.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may make recommendations to the director.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 19-11-227 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-227. Statistical data.
The State Procurement Director and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services shall cooperate with the
Division of Budgets and Accounting in the preparation of statistical data
concerning the procurement and disposition of all commodities and services,
unless otherwise provided in this subchapter.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 19-11-235(b), concerning the
responsibility of bidders and offerors, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, information furnished by a
bidder or offeror pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed outside of
the Office of State Procurement or the procurement agency without prior
written consent by the bidder or offeror.
(2) This section is not intended to prohibit the office from
disclosing such information to the Governor, the Attorney General, or the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services when any of those officers deems it necessary.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 19-11-242 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-242. Commodity management rules.
The State Procurement Director shall promulgate rules governing:
(1) The sale, lease, or disposal of surplus commodities by
public auction, competitive sealed bidding, or other appropriate method
designated by rule, and no employee of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services or member of the employee's immediate family
shall be entitled to purchase any such commodities;
(2) The transfer of excess commodities within the state; and
(3) The sale, lease, or disposal of surplus commodities to not-
for-profit organizations under § 22-1-101.

02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
SECTION 27. Arkansas Code 19-11-249(a)(2), concerning cooperative
purchasing, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) A cooperative purchasing agreement is limited to public
school construction services, commodities, and other services for which the
public procurement unit may realize savings or material economic value, or
both.
(B)(i) For cooperative purchasing agreements entered into
by a state agency, the State Procurement Director shall consider the economic
justification for using a cooperative purchasing agreement when granting or
withholding approval for the cooperative purchasing agreement.
(ii) The director shall adopt rules to create a
review policy outlining how the economic justification required under this
section may be demonstrated, including without limitation a comparison of:
(a) Current state contract pricing and the
pricing under a cooperative purchasing agreement; or
(b) Information obtained from a request for
information and pricing under a cooperative purchasing agreement.
(C) The director and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services shall submit any request
for the Office of State Procurement to participate in a cooperative
purchasing agreement to the Governor for approval.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 19-11-264(c), concerning submission of
contracts with members of the General Assembly, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The contract shall not be submitted to the Legislative Council or
to the Joint Budget Committee until the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services has reviewed the contract and provided the
Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee with a recommendation
regarding the legality of the contract.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code 19-11-271(a), concerning compliance
reporting, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Each report required under this subchapter shall be copied to the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services, who shall review each report for compliance with the fiscal
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
responsibility and management laws of the state under the State Fiscal
Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-601 et seq.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 19-11-705(b), concerning employee conflict
of interest, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Financial Interest in a Blind Trust. Where an employee or any
member of the employee's immediate family holds a financial interest in a
blind trust, the employee shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest
with regard to matters pertaining to that financial interest if disclosure of
the existence of the blind trust has been made to the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 19-11-706(a), concerning employee
disclosure requirements, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Disclosure of Benefit Received from Contract. Any employee who has
or obtains any benefit from any state contract with a business in which the
employee has a financial interest shall report such benefit to the Secretary
of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
However, this section shall not apply to a contract with a business where the
employee's interest in the business has been placed in a disclosed blind
trust.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code 19-11-712(b), concerning civil and
administrative remedies against employees who breach ethical standards, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) Supplemental Remedies. In addition to existing remedies for breach
of the ethical standards of this subchapter, or rules promulgated under this
subchapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may impose any one (1) or more of the following:
(1) Oral or written warnings or reprimands;
(2) Forfeiture of pay without suspension;
(3) Suspension with or without pay for specified periods of
time; and
(4) Termination of employment.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 19-11-713(b), concerning civil and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
administrative remedies against nonemployees who breach ethical standards, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) Supplemental Remedies. In addition to the existing remedies for
breach of the ethical standards of this subchapter, or rules promulgated
under this subchapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services may impose any one (1) or more of the
following:
(1) Oral or written warnings or reprimands;
(2) Termination of transactions; and
(3) Suspension or debarment from being a contractor or
subcontractor under state contracts.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 19-11-715 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-715. Duties of Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services.
(a) Rules. The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter
and shall do so in accordance with this subchapter and the applicable
provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(b) Advisory Opinions. On written request of employees or contractors
and in consultation with the Attorney General, the secretary may render
written advisory opinions regarding the appropriateness of the course of
conduct to be followed in proposed transactions. Such requests and advisory
opinions may be duly published in the manner in which rules of this state are
published. Compliance with the requirements of a duly promulgated advisory
opinion of the secretary shall be deemed to constitute compliance with the
ethical standards of this subchapter.
(c) Waiver. On written request of an employee, the secretary may grant
an employee a written waiver from the application of § 19-11-705, which
refers to employee conflict of interest, and grant permission to proceed with
the transaction to such extent and upon such terms and conditions as may be
specified. Such waiver and permission may be granted when the interests of
the state so require or when the ethical conflict is insubstantial or remote.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 19-11-716(b)(1), concerning participation
in business incubators, is amended to read as follows:
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(b)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall promulgate rules pursuant to the procedure for
adoption as provided under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., and under § 10-3-309 to implement a program allowing
admittance to business incubators by faculty or staff of state-supported
institutions of higher education or admittance by companies in which faculty
or staff may hold an ownership interest.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1014 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-1014. Compliance reporting — Definition.
(a) Each report required under this subchapter shall be copied to the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services, who shall review each report for compliance with the fiscal
responsibility and management laws of the state under the State Fiscal
Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-601 et seq.
(b) If the secretary determines that a state agency, agency
procurement official, or state official or employee may be in violation of
the fiscal responsibility and management laws of the state under the State
Fiscal Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-601 et seq., the secretary shall
notify the chief executive officer of the relevant state agency.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1101 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-1101. Contracts.
(a) An agency procurement official or procurement agent may enter into
contracts to acquire technology systems for performing the revenue-generating
functions and duties of the agency, including, but not limited to,
registration, processing, and collection functions.
(b) Any contract entered into under this subchapter between an agency
procurement official or procurement agent and a vendor of technology systems
shall provide for:
(1) Payment of the technology systems on the basis of a
percentage of the increase in the amount of specific taxes or fees collected,
including interest and penalties thereon, for a fixed time period, which
increase exceeds revenues projected prior to the project and is attributable
to the implementation and use of the technology system; or
(2) Payment of the technology system on a fixed fee contract
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
basis, the fee to be paid from the increase in the amount of specific taxes
or fees collected, including interest and penalties thereon, which increase
exceeds revenues projected prior to the project and is attributable to the
implementation and use of the technology system.
(c)(1) All contracts authorized by this subchapter shall be entered
into pursuant to the requirements of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-
201 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) Prior to execution of the contract, the following process
shall be followed:
(A) The requesting agency shall request approval from the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services to prepare a request for proposal for a project authorized under
this subchapter;
(B) The request shall include the general nature of the
project, the anticipated revenues that will be enhanced, and the forecasted
revenues for the current biennium;
(C) Upon approval of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, the requesting agency
shall prepare a request to the Department of Finance and Administration for
approval to prepare a request for proposal for a technology project
authorized under this subchapter;
(D) The request must include the revenue source or sources
that will be increased as a result of the project and the projected revenues
for the anticipated life of the project;
(E) The requesting agency shall prepare a request for
proposal, with advice and consultation from the department, for the purchase
of technology systems on the basis of a portion of the increase in the
agency's revenues produced by the technology system; and
(F)(i) The request for proposal may provide that the
agency and the vendor may negotiate an amount or baseline upon which the
increase in taxes or fees is measured.
(ii) Any contract other than a fixed fee contract
shall include a factor in the baseline calculation to account for an increase
in taxes or fees due solely to economic factors and not to the use of the
technology.
(3) The agency procurement official or procurement agent and the
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
vendor shall negotiate the contract, with the oversight of the department to
assist in negotiating an advantageous contract.
(4)(A) The agency director shall submit the proposed contract
and a request for new appropriation to the Governor or his or her designee.
(B) The accompanying information will include the
methodology used to calculate the baseline amount proposed by the agency and
other justifications and information that detail the program and the expected
benefits of the agreement.
(C) The Governor or his or her designee shall study the
request and determine whether the appropriation requested and the terms of
the proposed contract are in strict compliance with this subchapter.
(D)(i) The Governor may approve or modify the request for
new appropriation and the proposed contract.
(ii) Any modification of the proposed contract shall
be submitted to the vendor for approval.
(5)(A) Upon approval of the shared benefit agreement and new
appropriation request, the Governor shall seek the advice and recommendation
of the Legislative Council.
(B) Upon review of the Legislative Council, the Governor
shall forward a copy of his or her approvals to the agency director and the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(d) After receipt of the Governor's approvals, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall direct the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of
State to establish upon their books of record the necessary appropriation
accounts in accordance with the provisions as set out in this section from
the shared benefit holding appropriation.
(e) The requesting agency may utilize these appropriations to
implement the approved contract.
(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an agency that enters into
a contract according to this section from acquiring any goods or services
through appropriations for any function or program of that agency not
specifically included in any contract entered into according to this section.
(g) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may promulgate such rules, procedures, and guidelines
as he or she may deem necessary and proper in order to carry out the
provisions of this section.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 21-1-103(d), concerning the service
recognition program, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall promulgate reasonable rules as he or she deems
necessary in carrying out the provisions of this service recognition program.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 21-1-604(f), concerning civil liability
definitions, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) In the event the Office of Personnel Management implements an
employee grievance mediation program, a public employee or public employer
may voluntarily participate in mediation under the office's mediation program
if either one wishes to resolve a dispute between them that involves an
adverse action taken against the public employee.
(2) Voluntary mediation shall occur before a civil action in
which the public employee and public employer are parties has been initiated
in a court.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall adopt voluntary mediation application and
request forms.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 21-3-601(a), concerning the Arkansas
Public Service Internship Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall establish an internship program to be known as the “Arkansas
Public Service Internship Program”.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 21-4-214 is amended to read as follows:
21-4-214. Catastrophic leave program.
(a)(1) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall have administrative responsibility for developing,
implementing, and maintaining the statewide catastrophic leave bank program.
(2)(A) Each state agency shall participate in a catastrophic
leave bank to be administered by the Office of Personnel Management.
(B) The following governmental entities may establish a
catastrophic leave bank for the governmental entities' employees:
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(i) The General Assembly;
(ii) The Bureau of Legislative Research;
(iii) Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(iv) The Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(v) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(vi) The Supreme Court;
(vii) The Court of Appeals;
(viii) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(ix) A constitutional office; and
(x) An institution of higher education.
(b) Accrued annual leave and sick leave of employees may be donated to
a catastrophic leave bank.
(c) Catastrophic leave with pay may be granted to an employee when the
employee is unable to perform his or her duties due to a catastrophic
illness, including maternity purposes.
(d) An employee may be eligible for catastrophic leave when:
(1)(A) The employee has been employed by the state for one (1)
year or more or was previously employed by a public school district or state-
supported institution of higher education for one (1) year or more.
(B) A person who was employed by a public school district
or state-supported institution of higher education for less than one (1) year
also is eligible for catastrophic leave if:
(i) The person's combined years of employment with
the state and with a public school district or state-supported institution of
higher education totals more than one (1) year; and
(ii) The lapse in the person's employment between the
state and a public school district or state-supported institution of higher
education is less than six (6) months;
(2) The employee is female, and the catastrophic leave is to be
used for maternity purposes after:
(A) The birth of the employee's biological child;
(B) The placement of an adoptive child under one (1) year
of age in the home of the employee; or
(C) The foster placement of an infant under one (1) year
of age;
(3)(A) At the onset of the illness or injury the employee had to
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
his or her credit at least eighty (80) hours of combined sick and annual
leave and has exhausted all such leave, unless the combined sick and annual
leave requirement is waived under subdivision (d)(3)(B) of this section.
(B) A state agency director or a president of an
institution of higher education may waive the minimum eighty-hour requirement
for combined sick and annual leave if the agency director determines that the
employee warrants eligibility because of extraordinary circumstances under
the standards and guidelines promulgated under subdivision (g)(2) of this
section;
(C)(i) An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity
purposes is not required to exhaust sick or annual leave before being granted
catastrophic leave.
(ii) An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity
purposes does not accrue any leave;
(4) An acceptable medical certificate from a physician
supporting the continued absence is on file; and
(5) The employee has not been disciplined for any leave abuse
during the past year from the time of application.
(e)(1) Up to twelve (12) consecutive weeks of catastrophic leave with
full pay may be granted to an employee for maternity purposes.
(2) The employee shall be eligible for the leave only within the
first twelve (12) weeks after the birth, fostering, or adoption of a child.
(3) After the expiration of the twelve (12) weeks of leave under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section, maternity leave shall be treated as any
other leave for sickness or disability under § 21-4-209.
(4) Catastrophic leave for maternity purposes shall run
concurrently with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-
3.
(5) The employee shall not be eligible for an additional twelve
(12) weeks of leave for the adoption of a child if the employee took twelve
(12) weeks of leave after the initial foster placement of the same child into
the employee's home.
(f) If the illness or injury is that of an employee and is covered by
workers' compensation, the compensation based on catastrophic leave when
combined with the weekly workers' compensation benefit received by the
employee shall not exceed the compensation being received by the employee at
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the onset of the illness or injury.
(g) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services, or the secretary's designee, shall establish
policies and procedures:
(1) As deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section; and
(2) To prescribe the standards and guidelines of the
extraordinary circumstances that the state agency director or the president
of an institution of higher education may use to waive the minimum
requirement for combined sick and annual leave.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 21-5-106(b), concerning annual career
service recognition payments for state employees, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and publish
policies and procedures for the administration of career service recognition
payments to state employees upon a determination by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services that sufficient funds are available for such purpose.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 21-5-109(a), concerning electronic direct
deposit for new employees, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) As a condition of employment, a person hired or appointed to
a position in any agency in state government on or after August 12, 2005,
shall be required to accept payment of salary or wages by electronic warrants
transfer.
(B) The electronic warrants transfer shall be made in the
form of a direct deposit of funds to the account of the beneficiary of the
payment in any financial institution equipped for electronic fund transfers,
provided that the financial institution is designated in writing by the
beneficiary and has lawful authority to accept such deposits.
(2)(A)(i) Any person affected by the direct deposit requirement
set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may request an exemption from
the requirement.
(ii) The Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services may grant an exemption from
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the direct deposit requirement upon a showing of hardship to the person
requesting the exemption or upon any other reasonable basis.
(B) The secretary shall establish the standards and
procedures for granting an exemption from the direct deposit requirement set
forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(3) The direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall not apply to a person who is in the employment
of the state prior to August 12, 2005, and subsequently receives a promotion
appointment, transfer, or other change in position within the same personnel
system on or after August 12, 2005.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 21-5-203(a)(12), concerning definitions
under the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(12) “Office of Personnel Management” means the Office of
Personnel Management within the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services acting under the authority granted in this subchapter
and subject to the direction of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services;

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 21-5-211(b)(1), concerning the
implementation procedure for grade changes, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services determine
that general revenue funds are insufficient to implement the salary increases
authorized in this subchapter or by any other law that affects salary
increases for state employees, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the
secretary upon approval by the Governor may reduce the percentage of all
authorized salary increases for all state employees covered by this
subchapter without regard to whether or not the employees are compensated
from general or special revenues, federal funds, or trust funds.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 21-5-214(c)(1), concerning new
appointments and other compensation plan provisions, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) A state agency may request a special rate of pay for a specific
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the
midpoint pay level of the appropriate grade of a classification on the
appropriate pay table for the assigned grade with the written approval of the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 21-5-218 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-218. Reimbursement for interpreter services for deaf.
Whereas Arkansas Rehabilitation Services currently purchases and sells
staff interpreter services for the deaf with four (4) other agencies, the
University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, the University of Arkansas at Little
Rock, the Arkansas School for the Deaf, and the Administrative Office of the
Courts and whereas the need for interpreters is immediate and often for
crisis purposes and cannot be planned ahead, the Division of Workforce
Services is authorized to arrange for reimbursement with those agencies,
assuring that the amount paid from both agencies will not exceed the maximum
for the grades they occupy consistent with the intent of § 19-4-1604, with
notification and justification to the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 21-5-220(c), concerning shift
differentials, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a facility uses shifts other than traditional eight-hour
shifts, a shift differential may be paid for those shifts exceeding the
normal day shift of the facility.
(2) If shift and weekend differentials are provided to an
employee, the total compensation may exceed the maximum annual rate for the
assigned pay grade for those positions included in this subchapter.
(3)(A) The state agency shall identify the shifts, job
classifications, and positions to be eligible for the shift differential and
the differential percentage for which each classification is eligible within
each shift.
(B) The shift schedule, job classifications, positions,
and the percentage of shift differential for which the job titles will be
eligible shall be submitted to the Office of Personnel Management for
approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Administrative Services.
(C) Subsequent changes to the shift schedule, job
classifications, positions, and shift differential percentages shall be
submitted to the Office of Personnel Management and receive prior approval by
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 21-5-221(c) and (d), concerning
compensation differentials, are amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Hazardous duty differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be
authorized for the increased risk of personal physical injury for an employee
occupying a certain identified high-risk position if the:
(A) Position classification is determined to be physically
hazardous or dangerous due to location, facility, services provided, or other
factors directly related to the duty assignment of the positions; and
(B) Employee's regularly assigned work schedule exposes
him or her to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards during at least fifty
percent (50%) of the work time and the employee is not compensated for the
hazardous exposure.
(2)(A) The director of the requesting state agency shall
identify the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions and
classifications within the facility or unit that are identified as high-risk.
(B) The positions shall be certified by the state agency
director as having been assigned to a work environment that poses an
increased risk of personal injury and shall be submitted as part of the plan
for payment of hazardous duty differential to the Office of Personnel
Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Administrative Services in consultation with the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State after review and approval of the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(C) Subsequent changes to the facility or unit, location,
and eligible positions or classifications within the facility or unit on file
with the Office of Personnel Management shall receive prior approval by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services after review and approval by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(d) It is the intent of this subsection that hazardous duty
compensation shall be at the discretion of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services and the director of the
state agency and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside
for other programs within the state agency.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 21-5-222(a)(1), concerning salary
administration grids, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A state agency may request that a salary administration grid be
approved for specific classifications or positions if the:
(A) State agency has documented the need for a salary
administration grid for specified positions or classifications;
(B) Terms and conditions of a grid proposed by the state
agency address the needs of the targeted positions;
(C) Cost of implementing and maintaining a salary
administration grid is within the state agency's existing appropriation and
the implementation does not use funds specifically set aside for other
programs within the state agency;
(D) Salary administration grid has been submitted to the
Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services up to the
midpoint pay level; and
(E)(i) Salary administration grid has been submitted to
the Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services above the
midpoint pay level.
(ii) The Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services shall not approve the
salary administration grid in this subdivision (a)(1)(E) until the salary
administration grid has been reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 21-5-223(a)(1), concerning severance pay,
is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) If the agency director determines that it is necessary to
implement the state workforce reduction policy due to state agency
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
organization structure change, budgetary reductions, abolishment of positions
or duties, loss of functional responsibility by the state agency, or the loss
of federal funding, grants, or other special funds, the agency director, upon
approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services, may authorize the payment of funds on a regular
payroll schedule as severance pay to full-time, part-time, and job sharing
classified and nonclassified employees in regular positions affected by the
workforce reduction on the basis of the following pro rata lump sum for
completed years of service, including any formally implemented probationary
period:
Over one (1) year up to five (5) years Eight hundred dollars ($800)
Over five (5) years up to fifteen (15) years One thousand two hundred
dollars ($1,200)
Over fifteen (15) years One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600)

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 21-5-406(a), concerning the director of
the State Board of Finance, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The State Board of Finance shall choose the Director of the
Employee Benefits Division with the approval of the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
(2)(A) The director shall be employed by and serve at the
pleasure of the secretary, and shall perform all duties in consultation with
the secretary.
(B) However, the board may recommend the removal of the
director, but removal is subject to the approval of the secretary.
(3) The director shall employ staff adequate to manage the State
and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program within the funds
appropriated for the program within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 21-5-414(a), concerning partial state
contribution of employees' premiums, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall seek the advice of the Legislative Council and the House
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Insurance and
Commerce before additional state contributions can be made to the State and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Public School Life and Health Insurance Program on behalf of state employees.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 21-5-1101(a), concerning definitions in
the merit increase pay system, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services is authorized to develop and establish a merit increase pay system
in accordance with the performance evaluation process under § 21-5-1001 et
seq. for employees of all state agencies, boards, and commissions covered by
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.
(2) The merit increase pay system shall be reviewed by the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 21-5-1202(b), concerning the compensation
of employees of state agencies and state-supported institutions of higher
education — Emergency activities, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall establish appropriate procedures for the administration of
this section.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 21-11-104(a), concerning the procedure for
submission of suggestions, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services, or his or her designee, is directed to develop and
adopt rules in accordance with this chapter for the administration of the
Employee Suggestion System.

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 22-2-104 is amended to read as follows:
22-2-104. Creation of Building Authority Division.
(a) There is created within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services the Building Authority Division.
(b) The division shall carry out the duties and responsibilities set
out in § 22-2-108 under the policies, guidelines, standards, and procedures
established by the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.

02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 22-2-105 is amended to read as follows:
22-2-105. Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services — Duties.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may hire sufficient staff as authorized by
legislation to perform the duties of the Building Authority Division.
Personnel employed by the secretary shall be compensated according to the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., for similar
duties and responsibilities.
(b) The secretary shall be responsible for administering the rules and
policies adopted by the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The secretary shall be the disbursing agent for the division and
shall pay any and all accounts. The disbursing agent shall furnish and keep
in effect a bond to the state with a corporate surety thereon which, together
with any other bonds furnished by him or her, shall total in final sum not
less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and is conditioned that he or she
will faithfully perform his or her duties and properly handle all funds
received and disbursed by him or her and account for those funds. The bond so
furnished shall be filed in the office of the Auditor of State. The premium
on the bond shall be a proper charge against funds of the division.

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 22-2-107(a)(1)(A), concerning the creation
of Building Authority Division sections, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There are created within the Building Authority Division the
following sections which shall have the duties and responsibilities
designated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services and which may include, in relation to other
provisions of this chapter, the duties and responsibilities respectively
designated in this section:
(1) Construction Section. The Construction Section shall:
(A) Supervise the bidding and awarding of contracts for
new construction and renovations for or by state agencies' capital
improvements;

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code §22-2-108(a)(1), concerning the powers and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
duties, is amended to read as follows:
As may be provided, allowed, or limited by the provisions of this
chapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may establish policies, guidelines, standards, and
procedures which shall guide and govern the Building Authority Division with
regard to the following responsibilities, duties, powers, and activities:
(1) To investigate and obtain information concerning the various
boards, commissions, authorities, agencies, departments, and offices of the
state, which are the “state agencies”, in relation to:
(A) Where they are housed;
(B) Their present and projected needs for space and
facilities;
(C) The rental being paid and the rental that state
agencies could reasonably pay for space and facilities in public and private
buildings; and
(D) The public building space and facilities that can be
feasibly financed from appropriated funds available to the division;

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 22-2-110 is amended to read as follows:
22-2-110. Schedule of supervision generally.
The powers, authorities, and responsibilities of the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services relating to
the acquisition of properties and to the supervision of all capital
improvements, as defined in § 22-2-102, shall be in accordance with the
schedules of supervision as provided in §§ 22-2-111 — 22-2-113.

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 22-2-112 is amended to read as follows:
22-2-112. Schedule of supervision — Designated funds.
(a) From the funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the
Building Authority Division for the construction or purchase of a particular
building or capital improvement which is specifically designated to be
purchased, constructed, or improved for a particular state agency, the
division shall carry out the powers, authorities, and responsibilities in
respect to that construction or purchase as designated in § 22-2-111.
(b) The division shall review and approve architectural and
engineering design plans and construction plans to ensure compliance with
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
minimum design and construction standards and criteria promulgated by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services pursuant to this chapter.
(c) The division shall negotiate all contracts for architectural and
engineering and construction services and revisions and modifications to
those contracts.

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 22-2-113(a), concerning the schedule of
supervision, is amended to read as follows:
(a) In all other cases, within or without Pulaski County, Arkansas,
when the construction of public buildings or capital improvements is
undertaken or is presently being undertaken or is authorized but not
presently under contract by or for a state agency, then the Building
Authority Division shall serve in a technical advisory capacity to advise an
agency in relation to that agency's capital improvement and to perform review
and approval duties, specifically including, but not limited to, the
provision and performance of the following services and duties:
(1) Consult with the agency as to the need for and the type,
cost, and design of the capital improvement;
(2) Assist the agency in reviewing architectural proposals and
advising the agency in the selection of persons to perform architectural and
engineering services, but the agency shall have the responsibility of
selecting those persons. However, nothing in this subdivision (a)(2) shall
affect the power and responsibility of the Building Authority Division to
review and approve architectural and engineering design plans and to
negotiate contracts for architects' and engineers' services as otherwise
provided in this section;
(3) Review and approve architectural and engineering plans and
designs to ensure compliance with minimum design and construction standards
and criteria promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Administrative Services pursuant to this chapter;
(4) As agent for the state agency, negotiate and approve any
contractual terms, relationships, or responsibilities for architectural and
engineering services;
(5) Assist the state agency in receipt of bids for construction
contracts necessary for the capital improvement if bids are required by law;
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(6) Advise and assist the agency in the selection of persons to
perform construction services, but the agency shall have the responsibility
of selecting the persons to perform the services. However, nothing in this
subdivision (a)(6) shall affect the powers and responsibilities of the
Building Authority Division consistent with subdivisions (a)(7) and (8) of
this section;
(7)(A) Review and approve construction plans to ensure
compliance with minimum construction standards and criteria promulgated by
the secretary as provided in this chapter.
(B)(i) This subdivision (a)(7) does not apply to the
design or construction of an unpaved trail project.
(ii) The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel
Commission shall ensure that an unpaved trail project created under this
subdivision (a)(7) meets the standards for observation by registered
professionals as established by the Building Authority Division;
(8)(A) As agent for the agency, negotiate and approve all
construction contracts, revisions, and modifications necessary for the
capital improvement.
(B)(i) This subdivision (a)(8) does not apply to the
design or construction of an unpaved trail project.
(ii) The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel
Commission shall ensure that an unpaved trail project created under this
subdivision (a)(8) adheres to applicable public works laws;
(9) Assist and advise the state agency as to the operation,
management, and maintenance of the capital improvement. However, the
operation, management, and maintenance shall be in accordance with minimum
standards as promulgated by the secretary; and
(10) Otherwise take such action as may be necessary to carry out
the policies, standards, criteria, and other rules as may be adopted or
promulgated by the secretary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 22-2-114(a), concerning leasing
responsibilities, is amended to read as follows:
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that state agencies be
housed, whenever possible, in public buildings as soon as space and
facilities in public buildings are available and that the acquisition and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
granting of leasehold interests in land be regulated and supervised by the
Building Authority Division. The division and all other state agencies are
authorized and directed to implement that intent as follows:
(1)(A) The division is given the authority and responsibility to
act as the leasing agent for all state agencies and component parts thereof,
acting either as lessor or lessee, and to act as the agent for leasing space
in all public buildings located in the State of Arkansas.
(B) In addition, the division is given the authority and
responsibility to act as the leasing agent for any nonagency state entity if
requested in writing by a nonagency state entity to act in that manner and if
the responsibility for the services is accepted in writing by the division.
(C)(i) After July 1, 1975, no state agency shall enter
into or renew or otherwise negotiate a lease between itself as lessor or
lessee and a nongovernmental or other government lessor or lessee.
(ii) The division shall determine the needs of the
state agency, locate appropriate rental space, and act as the agent for the
state agency in negotiating the lease for the rental space;
(2) All state agencies and component parts thereof, when
requested by the division, shall execute and enter into leases with the
division for the leasing or renting of space and facilities in any public
buildings. The leases may be upon such conditions, for such terms, for such
rentals, and may contain such other provisions that the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services and the state agency
involved determine to be appropriate and in the best interests of all
concerned;
(3) Any state agency or component part thereof needing new or
additional space shall notify the division, and the division shall prepare a
lease for the space based upon the standards and criteria as adopted by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services. If space is available in a public building, the lease will be
negotiated for placement in the public building;
(4) If the Real Estate Services Section determines that adequate
space is not available in public buildings, the Real Estate Services Section
shall act as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section to obtain
adequate space from a privately owned facility;
(5)(A)(i) The secretary shall adopt standards and criteria for
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the leasing and utilization of space and the allocation of space to state
agencies.
(ii) These standards and criteria shall be used as a
basis for all planning, leasing of space, allocation of space to state
agencies, or advising state agencies on leasing considerations.
(iii) These standards and criteria shall include, but
not be limited to, equipment, work stations, private offices, conference
rooms, reception areas, general equipment, vaults, and the necessary space to
ensure adequate and effective circulation within and access to all state
agencies, including parking and traffic patterns.
(B) In cities and towns having a population of less than
twenty-five thousand (25,000) according to the last federal decennial census,
for those state agencies providing direct public access services, preference
shall be granted to lease space located in existing buildings in the central
business district, as defined by the locality's planning commission, or, in
the absence thereof, by the municipality's governing body, except in cases
where location within the central business district would impair or restrict
the intent of the services being provided to the public or the state's
proximity to other state or nongovernmental services or where rental rates
justify other locations;
(6) Leases as to office space, buildings, structures, parking
lots, and grounds from private individuals, firms, and corporations by state
agencies and component parts thereof shall be on a standard lease form
approved by the secretary. The standard lease form shall contain all terms
and conditions deemed necessary based on the type and purpose of the leased
property. The secretary also shall adopt a standard lease form to be used by
state agencies when subleasing from the division. Both standard lease forms
shall be approved as to the legality of form and content by the Attorney
General before becoming a requirement; and
(7) The division shall obtain and maintain files of all leases
in existence from and after July 1, 1975, to which a state agency or
component part thereof is a party.

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 22-2-115(a), concerning lease-purchase
agreements, is amended to read as follows
(a) For the express purpose of providing adequate office facilities,
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services, acting as the primary lessor, may enter into lease-purchase
agreements to obtain facilities for state agencies. Each lease-purchase
agreement shall contain a provision whereby the agreement shall be cancelled
at the close of each fiscal biennium, if necessary, if funds for the payment
of the rent under the lease-purchase agreement will not be available.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 22-2-120(b), concerning exemptions from
statutes concerning the Capitol Zoning District, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall endeavor to cooperate with the Capitol Zoning
District Commission so as to establish coordinated physical development in
the State Capitol area and to promote the uniform and appropriate regulation
and development of the State Capitol area.

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 22-3-405 is amended to read as follows:
22-3-405. Capitol Parking Control Committee — Creation — Members —
Meetings.
(a) There is created a committee to be known as the “Capitol Parking
Control Committee”, hereinafter referred to as “the committee”, which shall
have the powers and duties provided in § 22-3-406.
(b) The committee shall be composed of three (3) members, as follows:
(1) The Secretary of State or a designee;
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services or his or her designee; and
(3) A state employee designated by the Secretary of State who is
employed on the State Capitol grounds in a position of administrator or
higher by an agency or office other than that of the Secretary of State or of
the Building Authority Division.
(c) The Secretary of State shall be the chair of the committee, and
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services or his or her designee shall serve as secretary of the committee.
(d) Members of the committee shall serve without additional pay or
compensation.
(e) Meetings of the committee shall be held at such times and places
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
as shall be directed by the chair or upon the petition of two (2) members of
the committee.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 22-3-906 is amended to read as follows:
22-3-906. Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall be the custodian of all property held in the
name of the Building Authority Division, shall be its disbursing agent and
executive officer, and shall administer the provisions of this subchapter and
the rules and orders established thereunder.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall employ such assistants and other personnel as
are, in his or her opinion, necessary to properly administer the provisions
of this subchapter.
(c)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall furnish bond to the state, with a corporate
surety thereon, in the penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000),
conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties and
properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.
(2) An additional disbursing agent's bond shall not be required
of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services, and the bond so furnished shall be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State, and an executed counterpart thereof shall
be filed with the Auditor of State.
(3) The premium on the bond shall be a proper charge against the
funds under the control of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 22-3-918(d), concerning notice for bids for
construction bonds, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall execute all contracts awarded by the division.

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1207(a)(1), concerning certificates
of indebtedness and issuance and purchases authorized, is amended to read as
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
follows:
(a)(1) For the purpose of providing funds for the construction of
buildings as authorized in this subchapter, the Director of the Building
Authority Division, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, is
authorized and empowered to issue, and the State Board of Finance is
authorized and empowered to purchase, Building Authority Division
certificates of indebtedness of a total principal amount not to exceed
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1208(d), concerning certificates of
indebtedness and terms and execution, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The certificates of indebtedness shall be executed on behalf of
the division by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code §22-3-1404(8), concerning the powers of the
Building Authority Division, is amended to read as follows:
(8) Take such other actions not inconsistent with law as may be
necessary or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authority as
set forth in this section in accordance with the policies promulgated by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1405(4), concerning the duties of the
Building Authority Division, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Take such other actions not inconsistent with law as may be
necessary or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authority set
forth herein, in accordance with the policies promulgated by the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services as
authorized by law.

SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1902(a), concerning rules promulgated
for the Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies, is amended to
read as follow:
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Administrative Services shall promulgate rules for the implementation of the
Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies.

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601 is amended to read as follows:
22-6-601. Sale procedure.
(a)(1)(A) The several state boards or commissions having supervision
of the affairs of the charitable, penal, correctional, educational, and other
institutions of the State of Arkansas and all other state boards and
commissions, except the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Game and
Fish Commission, the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission, the State Parks,
Recreation, and Travel Commission, the Division of Higher Education, and
institutions of higher education, and the executive heads of all state
offices, departments, divisions, and agencies, all referred to separately as
“state agency”, may sell or purchase, for cash in hand and upon compliance
with the provisions of this section, the lands, in whole or in part,
belonging to or under the supervision or control of the respective state
agency or belonging to the state and held for the use or benefit of the state
agency.
(B) State agencies may purchase lands, so that the lands,
in whole or in part, shall belong to or be under the supervision or control
of the respective state agency or belong to the state and be held for the use
or benefit of the state agency.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(A) The sale of land by the Commissioner of State Lands;
(B) The transfer of state lands to political subdivisions
of the State of Arkansas;
(C) The transfer of state lands between state entities; or
(D) The exchange of state lands for other lands which are
suitable for state purposes if the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration has made a recommendation to the Governor that the exchange be
made and if the Governor has approved the exchange.
(b)(1) State agencies may transfer lands in whole or in part to the
Building Authority Division for the use of that state agency or other state
agencies.
(2) In the event that the Building Authority Division shall sell
the lands at a later date, the provisions of this section shall apply, and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the proceeds of the sale, less any expenses and liquidated damages, shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as a nonrevenue receipt to the credit of
the fund from which the state agency that transferred the land to the
Building Authority Division is operated.
(c)(1) In the event that a state agency elects to sell certain of its
lands or to purchase lands, the state agency shall certify to the Building
Authority Division its proposal for any sale or purchase.
(2)(A) The state agency proposing the sale or purchase of land
shall obtain the services of a qualified appraiser to appraise the lands so
proposed to be sold or purchased, with notice to the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
(B) The appraiser selected by the state agency, by
education or experience, shall:
(i) Be capable of determining the value of lands,
water and mineral rights, timber, and rural, agricultural, and
noncultivatable lands;
(ii) Understand legal descriptions of real
properties;
(iii) Have a working knowledge of county and state
real property records; and
(iv) Be capable of rendering dependable judgments of
the values of properties, determining the flood plains of the properties, and
of previous uses of the properties, which may result in environmental
remediation.
(C) The appraiser shall be licensed and certified by the
State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors.
(D) The appraiser shall take an oath or certify that he or
she will not, directly or indirectly, be engaged in the purchasing or selling
of the land or give information to any agent, friend, secret partner, or
other partner so as to secure advantages of the information to himself or
herself or any person, association, or company to the prejudice or exclusion
of any other person.
(d)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall furnish to the Governor:
(A) The appraisal;
(B) The state agency proposal to sell or purchase; and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(C) The Building Authority Division recommendations.
(2) The Governor, if he or she approves the proposed sale or
purchase, shall endorse his or her approval of the proposal and transmit a
copy of the proposal to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services.
(e)(1) The Building Authority Division shall give notice of the terms
of the sale by publication in one (1) newspaper regularly published in Little
Rock, Arkansas, and having a general circulation in the State of Arkansas, by
four (4) weekly insertions therein.
(2) If there is a newspaper published in the county in which the
lands are located having a general circulation therein, the notice shall also
be published in that newspaper one (1) time a week for four (4) consecutive
weeks, provided the land may be advertised for sale as a whole or in separate
tracts.
(f) The notice shall specify a time and place, which time shall be not
less than thirty (30) days from and after the date of the first insertion of
the notice, for the receipt by the Building Authority Division of sealed bids
for the purchase of the lands.
(g)(1) Each bid shall be accompanied by a cashier's check, payable to
the order of the state agency and drawn upon a bank or trust company doing
business in this state, in an amount equal to one-tenth (1/10) of the bid.
(2) The proceeds of the cashier's check of the successful bidder
shall be credited against the bid upon payment of the balance or shall be
retained by the state agency as liquidated damages upon failure to tender and
pay the balance of the bid price.
(3) Cashier's checks of unsuccessful bidders shall be returned
to them upon the completion of the sale to the successful bidder.
(4) The Building Authority Division, at the time and place
specified in the notice, or by announcement then and there, or at some other
time or place, shall open the bids which have been received and proceed to
accept the highest bid properly accompanied by a cashier's check for the
lands in whole or in part as offered for such sale.
(h)(1) The lands shall be sold for the highest aggregate responsible
bid, and no sale shall be otherwise than for cash, nor for less than the
amount of the appraisal.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(2)(A)(i)(a) Upon approval by the Governor, lands may be sold to
the highest responsible bidder for less than the amount of the appraisal if
the bid process has been utilized and it has been determined and recommended
by the state agency director and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services that further solicitation
of bids is unnecessary.
(b) Upon approval, the state agency may enter
into negotiations with the highest responsible bidder for the sale of the
lands.
(ii) If negotiations are unsuccessful, the state
agency may enter into negotiations with the next highest responsible bidder.
(B) Nothing shall preclude an agency from reletting bids
under this section if the negotiations as stated in subdivision (h)(2)(A) of
this section are unsuccessful.
(C) The Legislative Council shall review the sale of the
land before the state agency finalizes the sale.
(i)(1) Upon receipt from the successful bidder of the full amount of
his or her bid, the state agency shall execute and deliver its deed conveying
the lands to him or her and shall certify a copy of the deed to the Governor.
(2) The deed shall recite in detail the compliance with the
respective provisions of this section, which recitals shall be prima facie
evidence of the facts so set forth.
(3) The deed need not be acknowledged to entitle it to be
recorded.
(4) The effect of the deed, the provisions of this section
having been substantially complied with in the sale, shall be to vest the
purchaser with the title of the lands, at law and in equity, in fee simple
absolute.
(5) Any conveyance of title to lands owned by the State of
Arkansas shall be subject to § 22-6-113.
(j) Upon receipt thereof, the proceeds of the sale, including any
liquidated damages, shall be deposited into the State Treasury, as a
nonrevenue receipt, to the credit of the fund from which the state agency is
operated. Any unexpended balance of such proceeds remaining at the end of
each fiscal year as certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the
state agency director may be carried forward until the end of the biennium
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
following the biennium in which collected, after which any remaining balances
shall be subject to § 19-5-1004.
(k)(1) Before any state agency may receive donated land, the state
agency director shall certify the proposed donation request to the Building
Authority Division.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall forward a recommendation to the Governor.
(3) No donation shall be made without approval from the
Governor.
(l) Before a state agency purchases real property, the state agency
shall consult the Arkansas Buildings & Sites Database maintained by the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission to determine if there is a property
available for purchase that meets the practical and financial needs and
specifications of the state agency.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 22-9-201(c)(5), concerning the contracts
awarded by the State Highway Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services or a designee may make or authorize others to make
emergency contracting procedures as defined in subdivision (c)(3) of this
section and in accordance with the minimum standards and criteria of the
division.

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 22-9-208(a)(3), concerning the renovation
of historic sites, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The procedures provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section should be applicable for specific projects only after review and
approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, and the
Legislative Council. Provided, however, projects undertaken by public
institutions of higher education exempt from review and approval of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services shall not
require review and approval by the secretary.

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 22-10-501(b)(1), concerning the review and
approval of proposed qualifying projects, is amended to read as follows:
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(b)(1) Before execution of an interim agreement or a comprehensive
agreement, the responsible public entity shall:
(A) Review, negotiate, and select a qualifying project in
accordance with this chapter and the rules promulgated under this chapter;
and
(B)(i) Submit the proposed interim agreement or
comprehensive agreement to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Administrative Services for approval.
(ii) After completing all of the steps in subdivision
(b)(2) of this section, the responsible public entity shall submit a proposed
comprehensive agreement to the Governor for approval and authorization to
execute the comprehensive agreement.

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code § 22-10-502(a), concerning the duties of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall promulgate certain rules regarding the definitions and
guidelines related to the development of qualifying projects under this
chapter within ninety (90) days of August 1, 2017.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 22-10-503 is amended to read as follows:
22-10-503. Rules.
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall jointly
promulgate rules to administer this chapter, including without limitation
rules regarding:
(1) Criteria for selecting a qualifying project;
(2) Guidelines for a public entity operating under this chapter;
(3) Guidelines for monitoring and reporting on qualifying
projects;
(4) Timeline for selecting a qualified respondent;
(5) Guidelines for negotiating a comprehensive agreement;
(6) Guidelines for the accelerated selection of a qualified
respondent and the review and approval of a qualifying project that the
Governor determines to be a priority and that is funded, in whole or in part,
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
by dedicated revenues;
(7) Guidelines for selecting a qualifying project, including
without limitation:
(A) Reasonable criteria for selecting and scoring among
competing proposals;
(B) Financial review and analysis procedures for financial
and technical advisors or consultants that include without limitation:
(i) A cost-benefit analysis;
(ii) A value-for-money analysis, which shall include
without limitation a:
(a) Qualitative assessment;
(b) Quantitative assessment;
(c) Business case analysis; and
(d) Comparison of the net present value of the
total, risk-adjusted costs of delivering a qualifying project under this
chapter and through procurement methods outside of this chapter;
(iii) An assessment of the opportunity cost;
(iv) An analysis of the lifecycle costs, including
without limitation the design and construction costs, operating costs, and
maintenance and upgrade costs; and
(v) Consideration of the results of relevant studies
and analyses related to the proposed qualifying project;
(C) Procedures for considering the nonfinancial benefits
of a proposed qualifying project;
(D) Suggested timelines for selecting proposals and
negotiating an interim agreement or a comprehensive agreement;
(E) Criteria for allowing the responsible public entity to
accelerate the selection, review, and documentation timelines for proposals
involving a qualifying project that the responsible public entity considers
to be a priority;
(F) Procedures to:
(i) Determine the adequacy of the information
released when seeking proposals under this chapter; and
(ii) Allow the responsible public entity to release
more detailed information when seeking proposals if the responsible public
entity determines that the release of additional information is necessary to
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
encourage competition;
(G) Criteria, key decision points, and approvals that are
required to ensure that the responsible public entity considers the extent of
competition before selecting proposals and negotiating an interim agreement
or a comprehensive agreement;
(H) Criteria for establishing and determining any fees
that the responsible public entity elects to charge under § 22-10-202;
(I) Procedures for posting and publishing the public
notice of a responsible public entity's request for proposals, including
without limitation:
(i) Specific information and documentation to be
released regarding the nature, timing, and scope of the qualifying project;
(ii)(a) A reasonable time period as determined
by the responsible public entity to encourage competition and public-private
partnerships in accordance with the purpose of this chapter.
(b) However, the time period established under
subdivision (a)(7)(I)(ii)(a) of this section shall not be less than forty-
five (45) days, during which time the responsible public entity shall accept
the submission of proposals for the qualifying project under this chapter;
and
(iii) A process for posting the notice required under
this subdivision (a)(7)(I) on the responsible public entity's official
website and otherwise publishing the notice; and
(J) The maximum term of a comprehensive agreement for each
type of qualifying project for which the responsible public entity intends to
request proposals or invite bids from private entities;
(8) A responsible public entity's interaction with affected
local jurisdictions and other public entities, including without limitation:
(A) Considerations and guidelines for establishing and
determining the delivery of a request for proposals or an invitation for bids
by the responsible public entity to each affected local jurisdiction and
public entity that has complementary authority with respect to a qualifying
project;
(B) The method of identifying affected local jurisdictions
and public entities that have complementary authority with respect to a
qualifying project; and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(C) The time period during which an affected local
jurisdiction and a public entity other than the responsible public entity
may:
(i) Submit written comments regarding the proposed
qualifying project to the responsible public entity; and
(ii) Indicate whether the proposed qualifying project
is compatible with local plans and budgets;
(9) Considerations and guidelines for establishing and
determining the mandatory and optional elements of a proposal by a private
entity under this chapter, including without limitation:
(A) A project description, including without limitation:
(i) The location of the qualifying project; and
(ii) The specific or conceptual design of the
proposed facility, building, infrastructure, or improvement or a conceptual
plan for the provision of services or technology infrastructure;
(B) A feasibility statement that includes without
limitation:
(i) The method by which the private entity proposes
to secure any necessary property interests required for the qualifying
project;
(ii) A list of all permits and approvals required for
the qualifying project from local, state, and federal agencies; and
(iii) A list of public utility facilities, if any,
that will be crossed by the qualifying project and a statement of how the
private entity will accommodate the crossings;
(C) A schedule for the initiation and completion of the
qualifying project, including without limitation:
(i) The proposed responsibilities of the responsible
public entity and the private entity;
(ii) A timeline of the activities to be performed by
the responsible public entity and the private entity; and
(iii) A proposed schedule for obtaining the permits
required under subdivision (a)(9)(B)(ii) of this section;
(D) A plan for financing the qualifying project, including
without limitation:
(i) The sources of the private entity's funds;
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(ii) Any dedicated revenue source or proposed debt or
equity investment on behalf of the private entity;
(iii) A description of any user fees, lease payments,
and other service payments to be paid over the term of the interim agreement
or the comprehensive agreement; and
(iv) The methodology and circumstances for modifying
any user fees, lease payments, and other service payments;
(E) A business case statement that includes a basic
description of the indirect and direct benefits that the private entity can
provide in delivering the qualifying project, including without limitation
relevant cost, quality, and time frame data;
(F) The names and addresses of the persons who may be
contacted for further information concerning the request; and
(G) Any additional material and information that the
responsible public entity reasonably requests;
(10) Considerations and guidelines with respect to the
preliminary, mandatory, and optional requirements of an interim agreement and
a comprehensive agreement, including without limitation the:
(A) Engagement of:
(i) An attorney;
(ii) A certified public accountant;
(iii) A financial or economics professional; and
(iv) A consultant or other professional with
specialized expertise that is relevant to the proposed qualifying project;
(B)(i) Delivery of one (1) or more written evaluations or
assessments analyzing financial, legal, or other considerations that should
be evaluated by the public entity, including without limitation an assessment
of the costs of the qualifying project, the financial viability of the
qualifying project, and all other financial and operating assumptions related
to the qualifying project.
(ii) If municipal financing is a component of the
interim agreement, the responsible public entity shall obtain a written
evaluation of the proposed qualifying project from a municipal advisor
registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and the
Municipal Securities Rulemaking Board;
(C) Fees and expenses and the responsibility for paying
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
the fees and expenses associated with engaging an attorney, certified public
accountant, financial or economics professional, or other consultant; and
(D) Negotiation and creation of additional contracts for
services and materials, including without limitation revenue contracts,
construction contracts, management contracts, services contracts, and other
agreements related to the qualifying project;
(11) Considerations and guidelines with respect to the
preliminary, mandatory, and optional terms and conditions of an interim
agreement, including without limitation:
(A) Criteria for determining when the private entity is
permitted to commence activities and perform tasks related to the qualifying
project for which the private entity shall be compensated, including without
limitation:
(i) Project planning and development;
(ii) Design and engineering;
(iii) Environmental analysis and mitigation;
(iv) Surveying; and
(v) Ascertaining the availability of financing for
the proposed qualifying project and the ownership of any work product
developed;
(B) Criteria for establishing the process and timing of
the negotiation of the comprehensive agreement;
(C) The process for amending, extending, or supplementing
an interim agreement; and
(D) Other provisions and criteria related to the
development of a proposed qualifying project;
(12) Considerations and guidelines with respect to the
preliminary, mandatory, and optional terms and conditions of a comprehensive
agreement, including without limitation:
(A) A thorough description of the duties of the
responsible public entity and the qualified respondent in relation to the
development and operation of the qualifying project;
(B) Dates and schedules for the completion of the
qualifying project, including any available extensions or renewals of the
qualifying project;
(C) A pro forma analysis or budget under which the
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
qualifying project shall be developed, financed, constructed, operated, and
maintained;
(D) The source of all revenues derived from the operation
and maintenance of the qualifying project and any process for modifying the
revenues during the term of the comprehensive agreement;
(E) Financing and funding sources for the qualifying
project and any contractual provisions related to the financing and funding
sources for the qualifying project;
(F) A copy of each contract related to the development of
the qualifying project;
(G) Reimbursements to be paid to the responsible public
entity for services provided by the qualified respondent, if any;
(H) A process for the review of plans and specifications
for the qualifying project by the responsible public entity and the
engineering and architectural consultants of the responsible public entity,
if any;
(I) A process for the periodic and final inspection of the
qualifying project by the responsible public entity or its designee to ensure
that the qualified respondent's development activities comply with the
comprehensive agreement;
(J) For the components of the qualifying project that
involve construction, provisions for the:
(i) Delivery of maintenance, payment, and
performance bonds in the amounts that may be specified by the responsible
public entity in the comprehensive agreement; and
(ii) Posting and delivery of all other bonds, letters
of credit, or other forms of security acceptable to the responsible public
entity in connection with the development of the qualifying project;
(K) Submission to the responsible public entity by the
qualified respondent of proof of workers' compensation, property, casualty,
general liability, and other policies of insurance related to the development
and operation of the qualifying project in the amounts and subject to the
terms that may be specified by the responsible public entity in the
comprehensive agreement;
(L) A process for the responsible public entity's
monitoring of the practices of the qualified respondent to ensure that the
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
qualifying project is properly developed, constructed, operated, and
maintained;
(M) The filing by the qualified respondent of appropriate
financial statements with the responsible public entity related to the
operations of the qualifying project within the timeframes established in the
comprehensive agreement;
(N) Policies and procedures governing the rights and
responsibilities of the responsible public entity and the qualified
respondent if the comprehensive agreement is terminated according to the
terms of the comprehensive agreement or as the result of a default under the
terms of the comprehensive agreement; and
(O) The process for amending, extending, or supplementing
the terms of the comprehensive agreement; and
(13) Guidelines for using the value-for-money analysis as a
determinative factor in selecting a qualifying project.
(b) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may jointly
promulgate rules that establish procurement guidelines and requirements that
vary depending on the type of qualifying project.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 25-1-126(a)(1)(N), concerning the purchase
of flags with public funds, is amended to read as follows:
(N) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services;

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code § 25-1-128 is amended to read as follows:
25-1-128. Policy regarding use of technology resources and
cybersecurity by public entities — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Employee” means a person employed by a public entity;
(2) “Public entity” means an instrumentality funded in whole or
in part by taxpayer funds, including without limitation:
(A) The Department of Agriculture;
(B) The Department of Commerce;
(C) The Department of Corrections;
(D) The Department of Education;
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(E) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(F) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(G) The Department of Health;
(H) The Department of Human Services;
(I) The Department of Inspector General;
(J) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(K) The Department of the Military;
(L) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(M) The Department of Public Safety;
(N) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services;
(O) The Department of Veterans Affairs;
(P) The office of a constitutional officer;
(Q) A political subdivision of the state;
(R) A public school district;
(S) A public school district board of directors;
(T) An open-enrollment public charter school;
(U) An institution of higher education;
(V) The State Highway Commission;
(W) The Arkansas Department of Transportation; or
(X) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(3) “State educational entity” means an entity with an
educational purpose that is funded in whole or in part by taxpayer funds that
is, including without limitation:
(A) A public school district;
(B) A public school district board of directors; and
(C) An open-enrollment charter school;
(4) “State entity” means:
(A) The Department of Agriculture;
(B) The Department of Commerce;
(C) The Department of Corrections;
(D) The Department of Education;
(E) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(F) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(G) The Department of Health;
(H) The Department of Human Services;
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(I) The Department of Inspector General;
(J) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(K) The Department of the Military;
(L) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(M) The Department of Public Safety;
(N) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services;
(O) The Department of Veterans Affairs;
(P) The State Highway Commission;
(Q) The Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(R) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission; and
(S) An institution of higher education; and
(5) “Technology resources” means:
(A) The machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, including computers, word processors,
terminals, telephones, cables, software, and related products;
(B) The devices used to process information through
electronic capture, collection, storage, manipulation, transmission,
retrieval, and presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice,
or image and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(C) Any component related to information processing and
wired and wireless telecommunications, including data processing and
telecommunications hardware, software, services, planning, personnel,
facilities, and training;
(D) The procedures, equipment, and software that are
designed, built, operated, and maintained to collect, record, process, store,
retrieve, display, and transmit information, and the associated personnel,
including consultants and contractors; and
(E) All electronic mail accounts issued by a public
entity.
(b) A public entity shall:
(1) Create a technology resources policy that defines the
authorized use of technology resources for the public entity;
(2)(A) Develop a cybersecurity policy for all technology
resources of the public entity based on the standards and guidelines set by
the State Cyber Security Office.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(B) Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not apply
to political subdivisions of the state; and
(3)(A) Develop a training program for all employees of the
public entity concerning the technology resources policy and cybersecurity
policy.
(B) A political subdivision of the state is not required
to develop a training program under this section for a cybersecurity policy.
(c)(1) The technology resources policy for each state entity shall be
available to the public upon request.
(2) The Department of Education, in coordination with the State
Cyber Security Office, shall:
(A) Develop technology resources policies that shall be
used by each type of state educational institution; and
(B) Make the policies developed under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section available to the public upon request.
(d) Each technology resources policy shall include prohibitions on the
use of a public entity's technology resources, including without limitation
that a public entity's technology resources shall not be used to:
(1) Express a personal political opinion to an elected official
unless the opinion is:
(A) Within the scope of the employee's regular job duties;
or
(B) Requested by an elected official or public entity;
(2) Engage in lobbying an elected official on a personal opinion
if the employee is not a registered lobbyist for the public entity;
(3) Engage in illegal activities or activities otherwise
prohibited by federal law or state law; or
(4) Intentionally override or avoid the security and system
integrity procedures of the public entity.
(e) A public entity shall create a disciplinary procedure for a
violation of the public entity's technology resources policy concerning
authorized use of technology resources.
(f)(1) Each state entity shall submit a cybersecurity policy for the
state entity for approval to the State Cyber Security Office by October 1 of
each even-numbered year.
(2) The State Cyber Security Office shall establish a procedure
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
to review and approve state entity cybersecurity policies.
(3) The Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop a cybersecurity policy that shall be used by
each type of state educational institution;
(B) Submit the policies developed under subdivision
(f)(3)(A) of this section for approval to the State Cyber Security Office by
October 1 of each even-numbered year; and
(C) Coordinate with each state educational institution to
implement the cybersecurity policy.
(g) A public entity, except for a political subdivision of the state,
shall create a disciplinary procedure for a violation of the public entity's
cybersecurity policy in consultation with the State Cyber Security Office
that establishes:
(1) A disciplinary procedure for a violation of a state entity's
cybersecurity policy; and
(2) The reporting procedure for suspected violations of the
cybersecurity policy.
(h) All cybersecurity policies developed under this section shall not
be deemed open public records under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §
25-19-101 et seq.
(i) The disciplinary procedures under subsection (e) of this section
shall not apply to employee communications made in compliance with the:
(1) Public Employees' Political Freedom Act of 1999, § 21-1-501
et seq.; or
(2) Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, § 21-1-601 et seq.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 25-1-129(d), concerning the purchase of
small unmanned aircraft from covered foreign entity by public entities, is
amended to read as follows:
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services may waive the restriction under subdivision (b)(2) or
subdivision (c)(2) of this section upon:
(1) His or her review of the necessity to purchase a small
unmanned aircraft system that is manufactured or assembled by a covered
foreign entity due to exigent circumstances, Counter Unmanned Aircraft
Systems, or criminal investigative purposes; and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(2) Notification to the General Assembly.

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 25-1-901(4)(A), concerning definitions, is
amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) “State entity” means an instrumentality of state
government, including:
(i) The Department of Agriculture;
(ii) The Department of Commerce;
(iii) The Department of Corrections;
(iv) The Department of Education;
(v) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(vi) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(vii) The Department of Health;
(viii) The Department of Human Services;
(ix) The Department of Inspector General;
(x) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(xi) The Department of the Military;
(xii) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(xiii) The Department of Public Safety;
(xiv) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services; and
(xv) The Department of Veterans Affairs.

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 25-1-904(b) and (c), concerning state
entity training, are amended to read as follows:
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall develop rules for the enforcement of the
provisions of this subchapter.
(c) Each state entity head shall:
(1) Issue a policy incorporating the requirements of this
subchapter into state entity operations;
(2) Request that the state entity thoroughly review and assess
not less than annually thereafter, state entity compliance with the
requirements of the policy in the form of a report submitted to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services; and
(3) Assign at least one (1) employee of the state entity
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
responsibility for ensuring compliance with the requirements of the policy

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 25-4-104 is amended to read as follows:
25-4-104. Division of Information Systems.
(a) There is established within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services the Division of Information Systems.
(b)(1) The Division of Information Systems shall be headed by a
director to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
Senate in the manner provided by law, and shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor.
(2) The director shall be a person who, by education and
training, has technical knowledge and management experience in information
technology-related equipment, systems, and services.
(3) The director shall qualify by filing the oath of office
required in the Arkansas Constitution with the Secretary of State.
(c) The director, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, may establish divisions
and the organizational structure deemed necessary and appropriate for the
efficient performance of the duties imposed under the provisions of this
chapter, provided the organizational structure of the division shall conform
to the positions authorized and limitations provided therefor in the biennial
appropriation of the division.
(d) The director, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services, shall appoint the
deputy and division directors and the professional, technical, and clerical
assistants and employees as necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter. All employees of the division shall be employed by the department
and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
(e) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services any matters relating to
abuses of this chapter.
(f) The director shall recommend statutory changes to the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code § 25-4-111(c), concerning information
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
technology prerequisites, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Upon evaluation of the waiver request, the director shall
notify the agency in writing of his or her approval or rejection of the
request and his or her reasons.
(2) The director shall make his or her evaluation in a timely
manner. If the director requires more than thirty (30) days to complete the
evaluation, he or she shall report in writing to the Governor and the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services his or her reasons for the delay in completion.
(3) If the director rejects a request for a waiver, a state
agency shall not make any expenditure of public funds for the acquisition or
expansion of information technology equipment or services.
(4) If the director determines that the agency needs additional
information technology resources, he or she may:
(A) Authorize the agency to acquire the requested
information technology in accordance with the state enterprise architecture;
(B) Authorize acquisition of a modified information
technology configuration;
(C) Notify the agency of the availability of Division of
Information Systems facilities to provide the requested information
technology; or
(D) Recommend that the information technology be provided
through the facilities of some other designated state agency.

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code § 25-4-115(b)(1), concerning the
professional services contracts between the Division of Information Systems
and outside vendors, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The division may utilize moneys appropriated for maintenance,
operation, and payment of regular salaries of the division for the purchase
of professional services upon approval by the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 89. Arkansas Code § 25-4-119(b), concerning budget procedures
of the Division of Information Systems, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) When the General Assembly has completed the appropriation
process, the director shall oversee budgetary planning for the division for
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
each fiscal year of the biennium.
(2) The proposed annual operating budget shall be submitted to
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services for his or her approval prior to the beginning of each fiscal year.
(3)(A) During the course of the biennium, the director shall
make certain that the expenditures of the division do not exceed the income
to be received by the division for the current fiscal year.
(B) Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State upon the written application of the division and review
by the Legislative Council, in order to effect compliance with state and
federal statutory and regulatory provisions:
(i) The director shall adjust rates for services or
issue billing adjustments as necessary; or
(ii) Funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be
provided to the division.
(4)(A) If rates charged to a customer are increased to ensure
compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions under
subdivision (b)(3) of this section, then the director shall promptly notify
the Governor, the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information
Technology, and all state agencies and other customers before any changes
shall be effected.
(B) Rates shall be reviewed by the division on no less
than an annual basis in order to ensure compliance with state and federal
statutory and regulatory provisions.

SECTION 90. Arkansas Code § 25-4-127(a) and (b), concerning the
creation of a Data and Transparency Panel, are amended to read as follows:
(a) The Data and Transparency Panel is created within the Department
of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.
(b) The panel shall consist of the following members:
(1)(A) Three (3) appointees from the private sector who shall be
appointed as follows:
(i) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
Governor;
(ii) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(iii) One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(B) Each appointee shall serve at the pleasure of his or
her appointer.
(C) The appointer of an appointee who vacates his or her
position on the panel shall fill the vacancy as required under this section;
(2) The Attorney General or his or her designee;
(3) The secretaries, directors, or their designees, of the
following entities:
(A) The Department of Public Safety;
(B) The Department of Inspector General;
(C) The Department of Education;
(D) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(E) The Department of Corrections;
(F) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(G) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(H) The Department of Health;
(I) The Department of Agriculture;
(J) The Department of Human Services;
(K) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services;
(L) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(M) The Department of Veteran Veterans Affairs;
(N) The Department of the Military; and
(O) The Department of Commerce;
(4)(A) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems.
(B) The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information
Systems shall be the Chair of the Data and Transparency Panel.
(C) The members of the panel shall select a vice chair
annually;
(5) The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information
Systems; and
(6) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or her
designee.

02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
SECTION 91. Arkansas Code 25-8-106 is amended to read as follows:
25-8-106. Marketing and redistribution of state personal property.
(a)(1) This section applies only with respect to personal property.
(2) This section does not apply to or affect the:
(A) Disposition of surplus real property of the state; or
(B) Sale of plants, animals, or commodities of plants or
animals by a public institution of higher education if the proceeds from the
sale are used solely for agricultural research, extension, or teaching
programs, including without limitation 4-H programs and National FFA
Organization programs.
(b)(1) There is created within the Office of State Procurement a
Marketing and Redistribution Section for the purpose of promoting and
ensuring effective utilization of surplus state property.
(2)(A) All state agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and
colleges and universities are required and county, municipal, or other tax-
supported institutions are authorized to utilize the services of the
Marketing and Redistribution Section, unless specifically exempted in writing
by the State Procurement Director.
(B)(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to make
it mandatory that county, municipal, or other local government units utilize
the services of the Marketing and Redistribution Section.
(ii) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
make it mandatory that any agency, department, division, office, board,
commission, or institution of this state, including state-supported
institutions of higher education, utilize the services of the Marketing and
Redistribution Section in the sale of surplus computer equipment and
electronics to state agency employees for a price not less than ten percent
(10%) above depreciated value.
(3) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall maintain adequate and accurate records of the costs for
operating the Marketing and Redistribution Section and is authorized to
establish fair and reasonable charges for the services of the Marketing and
Redistribution Section. The charges for services shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts, there to be credited to the Property
Sales Holding Fund for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the
Marketing and Redistribution Section.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(c) The office may maintain an inventory of furniture, equipment, and
other items which shall be made available to state agencies on rental
agreements based upon fair and reasonable rental values.
(d) The department is authorized to establish a fair and reasonable
fee schedule for redistributing property between state agencies upon their
request.
(e) Proceeds from the sale, transfer, or rental of property by the
director shall be accounted for as follows:
(1) The purchasers, transferees, and lessees of property
available for such purposes as are authorized by this section shall transmit
to the office the agreed sale price, service charge, or rental fee;
(2) The office shall deposit the full amount of proceeds
received, as set out above, into the State Treasury in the manner as provided
by law; and
(3)(A) Proceeds from the sale or transfer of property deposited
into the State Treasury shall be classified as nonrevenue receipts and
credited to the Property Sales Holding Fund herein created on the books of
the Treasurer of State as a trust fund.
(B) Funds deposited into the Property Sales Holding Fund
may be expended only by the selling or transferring agency under procedures
established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and appropriations
provided by the General Assembly.
(C) However, funds deposited into the Property Sales
Holding Fund from the sale of property purchased from agency cash funds may
be refunded to the agency cash fund from which the original expenditure was
made by the issuance of a warrant under procedures established by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State and the Auditor of State to be payable from
appropriations provided by the General Assembly for disposition of the
proceeds.
(f) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules, not
inconsistent with law, for compliance with the provisions of this section,
the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., and the sale of surplus
commodities to not-for-profit organizations under § 22-1-101.

02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
SECTION 92. Arkansas Code § 25-8-110(a)(1), concerning the duties of
Department of Shared Administrative Services and Department of Finance and
Administration, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services shall:
(1) Develop retention schedules for control, preservation,
protection, and disposition of the electronic records of state agencies under
§ 25-18-601 et seq.;

SECTION 93. Arkansas Code § 25-10-503 is amended to read as follows:
25-10-503. Arkansas State Hospital contingency positions.
(a) If the Department of Human Services determines, after prior review
by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the
Joint Budget Committee, that it is in the best interest of the state to
discontinue a management contract with a private provider and it is deemed
necessary to utilize Department of Human Services staff to provide the
required services, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services may
request the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services
to approve the establishment of one (1) or more additional positions at
salary rates not to exceed the maximum salaries established for comparable
positions in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et
seq., the operative appropriation act of the Department of Human Services,
and the operative appropriation act of the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences.
(b) Upon approval by the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services and after review by the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, the Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
Services may establish positions described in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) If the division requests continuation of a position as established
in this section, the position shall be requested as a new position in the
division's budget request.

SECTION 94. Arkansas Code § 25-32-117 is amended to read as follows:
25-32-117. Creation and retention of electronic records and conversion
of written records by governmental agencies.
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(a) Each governmental agency of this State state shall determine
whether and the extent to which it will create and retain electronic records
and convert written records to electronic records.
(b) Each state agency shall comply with applicable standards and
policies adopted or established by the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services with advice and review from the Division of
Information Systems to determine whether and the extent to which it will
retain and convert written records to electronic records.

SECTION 95. Arkansas Code § 25-32-118(a), concerning the acceptance
and distribution of electronic records by governmental agencies, is amended
to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in § 25-32-112(f), each
governmental agency of this state shall determine whether and the extent to
which it will send and accept electronic records and electronic signatures to
and from other persons and otherwise create, generate, communicate, store,
process, use, and rely upon electronic records and electronic signatures.
(2) For state agencies, the determinations shall be consistent
with applicable standards and policies adopted or established by the
Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative Services with advice
and review from the Division of Information Systems.

SECTION 96. Arkansas Code § 25-43-104(a), concerning cabinet-level
departments, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following cabinet-level departments are created:
(1) The Department of Agriculture;
(2) The Department of Commerce;
(3) The Department of Corrections;
(4) The Department of Education;
(5) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(6) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(7) The Department of Health;
(8) The Department of Human Services;
(9) The Department of the Inspector General;
(10) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(11) The Department of the Military;
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
(12) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(13) The Department of Public Safety;
(14) The Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services; and
(15) The Department of Veterans Affairs.

SECTION 97. Arkansas Code § 25-43-108(d), concerning cabinet-level
department secretaries, is amended to read as follows:
(d) There is hereby created one (1) new classification and position
for the executive head for each cabinet-level department, designated as
follows:
(1) Secretary of the Department of Agriculture;
(2) Secretary of the Department of Commerce;
(3) Secretary of the Department of Corrections;
(4) Secretary of the Department of Education;
(5) Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment;
(6) Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration;
(7) Secretary of the Department of Health;
(8) Secretary of the Department of Human Services;
(9) Secretary of the Department of Inspector General;
(10) Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing;
(11) Secretary of the Department of the Military;
(12) Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(13) Secretary of the Department of Public Safety;
(14) Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services; and
(15) Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs.

SECTION 98. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1501 is amended to read as follows:
25-43-1501. Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services.
There is created the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services as a cabinet-level department.

SECTION 99. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1502 is amended to read as follows:
25-43-1502. State entities transferred to the Department of
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Transformation and Shared Services.
(a) The administrative functions of the following state entities are
transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services by a cabinet-level department transfer:
(1) The Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board, created
under § 15-21-503;
(2) The Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office, created
under § 15-21-502;
(3) The Building Authority Division, created under § 22-2-104;
(4) The Data and Transparency Panel, created under § 25-4-127;
(5) The Department of Information Systems, created under § 25-4-
104, now to be known as the “Division of Information Systems”;
(6) The Employee Benefits Division, created under § 25-43-1505;
(7) The Office of Personnel Management, created under § 25-43-
1504; and
(8) The Office of State Procurement, created under § 19-11-215.
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department
transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities
under a state entity transferred to the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services under subsection (a) of this section,
including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a
state entity transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose
administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services under subsection (a) of
this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state
entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services in the same manner as
before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

SECTION 100. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1503(a), concerning the Secretary
of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) The executive head of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services shall be the Secretary of the Department of
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
Transformation and Shared Administrative Services.

SECTION 101. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1504 is amended to read as follows:
25-43-1504. Office of Personnel Management — State Personnel
Administrator.
(a) There is created within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Administrative Services the Office of Personnel Management.
(b)(1)(A) The Director of the Office of Personnel Management shall be
known as the “State Personnel Administrator”.
(B) The State Personnel Administrator shall be employed by
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Administrative
Services with the advice and consent of the Governor.
(2) The office shall be under the overall direction, control,
and supervision of the secretary.

SECTION 102. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1505 is amended to read as follows:
25-43-1505. Employee Benefits Division.
There is created within the Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services the Employee Benefits Division.

SECTION 103. DO NOT CODIFY. Corrections. The Arkansas Code Revision
Commission may change references to the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services to the Department of Shared Administrative Services:
(1) During the codification of legislation enacted during the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly; and
(2) In existing law that was not included in this act.

SECTION 104. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of
Arkansas rely on state agency names to conduct their business; that to ensure
the efficient operations of state government agencies it is important to set
a date certain for the official change of the name of an agency; and that
this act is necessary because it will allow the agency to prepare for the
official name change in a timely and efficient manner. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 SB147
on July 1, 2025.

/s/J. Dotson

































02-05-2025 11:54:10 MBM119